Virginia statutes. Title 6.2. Financial Institutions and Services.
Chapter 22. Motor Vehicle Title Loans.

§ 6.2-2200.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Affiliate”
means a person related to a licensee by common ownership or control, or any employee or agent of a licensee.

“Annual percentage rate”
has the same meaning as in the federal Truth in Lending Act (15 U.S.C. § 1601 et seq.) and its implementing regulations, as they may be amended from time to time. All fees and charges payable directly or indirectly by a borrower to a licensee as a condition to a loan, including interest and the monthly maintenance fees authorized under §

6.2-2216

, shall be included in the computation of the annual percentage rate.

“Bond”
includes any form of financial instrument that provides security equivalent to that provided by a bond, such as an irrevocable letter of credit, if its use in lieu of a bond is authorized pursuant to regulations adopted by the Commission.

“Interest”
means all charges payable directly or indirectly by a borrower to a licensee as a condition to a loan, including fees, service charges, and renewal charges, and any ancillary product sold in connection with a loan, but does not include the monthly maintenance fees, deposit item return fees, late charges, or reasonable costs of repossession and sale authorized under §

6.2-2216

.

“Licensee”
means a person to whom a license has been issued under this chapter.

“Loan amount”
means the principal amount of a loan exclusive of fees or charges.

“Motor vehicle”
means an automobile, motorcycle, mobile home, truck, van, or other vehicle operated on public highways and streets.

“Motor vehicle title loan”
or

“title loan”

means a loan secured by a non-purchase money security interest in a motor vehicle.

“Motor vehicle title loan agreement”
or

“loan agreement”

means a written document that sets out the terms and conditions under which a licensee agrees to make a motor vehicle title loan to a borrower, and the borrower agrees to give to the licensee a security interest in a motor vehicle owned by the borrower to secure repayment of the motor vehicle title loan and performance of the other obligations under the loan agreement.

“Person”
means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, cooperative, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, or other legal or commercial entity.

“Principal”
means any person who, directly or indirectly, owns or controls (i) 10 percent or more of the outstanding stock of a stock corporation or (ii) a 10 percent or greater interest in any other type of entity.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-480; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 477 enacted Chapter 21 of Title 6.1, from which this chapter is derived. At the direction of the Virginia Code Commission it was given effect as Chapter 22 [§

6.2-2200

et seq.] of Title 6.2 pursuant to § 30-152 and Acts 2010, c. 794, cl. 4.

Acts 2010, c. 477, cl. 3 provides: “That nothing in this act shall prohibit the collection of any outstanding loan or extension of credit made under § 6.1-330.78 [now §

6.2-312

] of the Code of Virginia that is secured by a lien on a motor vehicle, in accordance with the terms of a loan agreement made prior to the effective date of this act; however, no additional extensions of credit or advances shall be made under such motor vehicle secured loan agreement, and such a motor vehicle secured loan agreement shall not be extended or renewed, on or after the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2010, c. 477, cl. 4 provides: “That an applicant for a license pursuant to Chapter 21 (§ 6.1-480 et seq.) of Title 6.1 [now Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 6.2] of the Code of Virginia shall not be required to provide to the State Corporation Commission, in connection with the State Corporation Commission’s determination of whether the applicant satisfies the qualifications for licensure set forth in § 6.1-486 [now §

6.2-2206

], any business records or documents that relate to loans made by the applicant prior to October 1, 2007, pursuant to § 6.1-330.78 [now §

6.2-312

] of the Code of Virginia. In addition, matters involving extensions of credit secured by a motor vehicle that have been reviewed and resolved between a person and the Commonwealth prior to the enactment of this act shall not be a bar to licensure under Chapter 21 (§ 6.1-480 et seq.) of Title 6.1 [now Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 6.2] of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2010, c. 477, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2010.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 3 provides: “That any person not licensed under Chapter 15 (§

6.2-1500

et seq.), Chapter 18 (§

6.2-1800

et seq.), or Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 6.2 of the Code of Virginia who will be required to be licensed when the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act become effective shall apply for a license on or before October 1, 2020. Any license issued by the State Corporation Commission to any such person prior to January 1, 2021, shall become effective January 1, 2021.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and inserted the definitions for “Affiliate,” “Annual percentage rate,” “Interest” and “Loan amount.”

§ 6.2-2201.
License required.

Unless exempted from the provisions of this chapter pursuant to §

6.2-2202

:

No person shall engage in the business of making motor vehicle title loans to residents of the Commonwealth or to any individuals in the Commonwealth, whether or not the person has a location in the Commonwealth, except in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and without having first obtained a license under this chapter from the Commission;

No person shall engage in the business of arranging or brokering motor vehicle title loans for residents of the Commonwealth, or any individuals in the Commonwealth, whether or not the person has a location in the Commonwealth; and

Any loan made in violation of this section is void, and no person shall have the right to collect, receive, or retain any principal, interest, fees, or other charges in connection with the loan.

The provisions of subsection A shall apply to any person who seeks to evade its application by any device, subterfuge, or pretense whatsoever, including:

The loan, forbearance, use, or sale of (i) credit, as guarantor, surety, endorser, comaker, or otherwise; (ii) money; (iii) goods; or (iv) things in action;

The use of collateral or related sales or purchases of goods or services, or agreements to sell or purchase, whether real or pretended; receiving or charging compensation for goods or services, whether or not sold, delivered, or provided; and

The real or pretended negotiation, arrangement, or procurement of a loan through any use or activity of a third person, whether real or fictitious.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-481; 2011, c. 418; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 477, cl. 2 provides: “That the State Corporation Commission shall establish a procedure, to be in effect by August 1, 2010, for any person to apply, prior to October 1, 2010, for a license to be issued pursuant to Chapter 21 (§ 6.1-480 et seq.) of Title 6.1 [now Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 6.2] of the Code of Virginia, when such chapter becomes effective.”

Acts 2010, c. 477, cl. 4 provides: “That an applicant for a license pursuant to Chapter 21 (§ 6.1-480 et seq.) of Title 6.1 [now Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 6.2] of the Code of Virginia shall not be required to provide to the State Corporation Commission, in connection with the State Corporation Commission’s determination of whether the applicant satisfies the qualifications for licensure set forth in § 6.1-486 [now §

6.2-2206

], any business records or documents that relate to loans made by the applicant prior to October 1, 2007, pursuant to § 6.1-330.78 [now §

6.2-312

] of the Code of Virginia. In addition, matters involving extensions of credit secured by a motor vehicle that have been reviewed and resolved between a person and the Commonwealth prior to the enactment of this act shall not be a bar to licensure under Chapter 21 (§ 6.1-480 et seq.) of Title 6.1 [now Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 6.2] of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 418, in subdivisions 1 and 2, substituted “residents of the Commonwealth or to any individuals in the Commonwealth” or similar language for “any individual residing in the Commonwealth.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and added the subsection A designation; added subdivision A 3 and subsection B and made stylistic changes.

§ 6.2-2202.
Scope of chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any bank, savings institution, or credit union, or to a person licensed under Chapter 15 (§

6.2-1500

et seq.), that does not elect to become licensed under this chapter. Electing to become licensed under this chapter, however, shall constitute a waiver of the benefit of any and all laws of the Commonwealth and other states, territories, possessions, and districts of the United States and federal laws preemptive of, or inconsistent with, the provisions of this chapter.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to extensions of credit for the sole purpose of financing the purchase of a motor vehicle, or of refinancing a purchase money loan, secured by a lien on the motor vehicle.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-482.

§ 6.2-2203.
Application for license; form; content; fee.

An application for a license under this chapter shall be made in writing, under oath, and on a form provided by the Commissioner.

The application shall set forth:

The name and address of the applicant and (i) if the applicant is a partnership, firm, or association, the name and address of each partner or member; (ii) if the applicant is a corporation or limited liability company, the name and address of each director, member, registered agent, and principal; or (iii) if the applicant is a business trust, the name and address of each trustee and beneficiary;

The addresses of the locations of the business to be licensed; and

Such other information concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience, and activities of the applicant and its members, officers, directors, and principals as the Commissioner may require.

The application shall be accompanied by payment of an application fee of $500, or other reasonable amount that the Commission may prescribe by regulation.

The application fee shall not be refundable in any event. The fee shall not be abated by surrender, suspension, or revocation of the license.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-483; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and added “or other reasonable amount that the Commission may prescribe by regulation” in subsection C at the end.

§ 6.2-2204.
Bond required.

The application for a license shall also be accompanied by a bond filed with the Commissioner with corporate surety authorized to execute such bond in the Commonwealth, in the sum of $50,000 per location, or such greater sum as the Commission may require, but not to exceed a total of $500,000. The form of such bond shall be approved by the Commission. Such bond shall be continuously maintained thereafter in full force. Such bond shall be conditioned upon the applicant or licensee performing all written agreements with borrowers or prospective borrowers, correctly and accurately accounting for all funds received by him in his licensed business, and conducting his licensed business in conformity with this chapter and all applicable laws. Any person who may be damaged by noncompliance of the licensee with any condition of such bond may proceed on such bond against the principal or surety thereon, or both, to recover damages. The aggregate liability under the bond shall not exceed the penal sum of the bond.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-484; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and
inserted “or such greater sum as the Commission may require, but” in the first sentence.

§ 6.2-2205.
Investigation of applications.

The Commissioner may make such investigations as he deems necessary to determine if the applicant has complied with all applicable provisions of law and regulations adopted thereunder.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-485.

§ 6.2-2206.
Qualifications.

Upon the filing and investigation of an application for a license, and compliance by the applicant with the provisions of §§

6.2-2203

and

6.2-2204

, the Commission shall issue and deliver to the applicant the license applied for to engage in business under this chapter at the locations specified in the application if it finds:

That the financial responsibility, character, reputation, experience, and general fitness of the applicant and its members, senior officers, directors, trustees, and principals are such as to warrant belief that the business will be operated efficiently and fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with law; and

That the applicant has unencumbered liquid assets per location available for the operation of the business of at least $75,000.

If the Commission fails to make such findings, no license shall be issued and the Commissioner shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for such denial.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-486.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2010, c. 477, cl. 4 provides: “That an applicant for a license pursuant to Chapter 21 (§ 6.1-480 et seq.) of Title 6.1 [now Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 6.2] of the Code of Virginia shall not be required to provide to the State Corporation Commission, in connection with the State Corporation Commission’s determination of whether the applicant satisfies the qualifications for licensure set forth in § 6.1-486 [now §

6.2-2206

], any business records or documents that relate to loans made by the applicant prior to October 1, 2007, pursuant to § 6.1-330.78 [now §

6.2-312

] of the Code of Virginia. In addition, matters involving extensions of credit secured by a motor vehicle that have been reviewed and resolved between a person and the Commonwealth prior to the enactment of this act shall not be a bar to licensure under Chapter 21 (§ 6.1-480 et seq.) of Title 6.1 [now Chapter 22 (§

6.2-2200

et seq.) of Title 6.2] of the Code of Virginia.”

§ 6.2-2207.
Licenses; places of business; changes.

Each license shall state the address or addresses at which the business is to be conducted and shall state fully the legal name of the licensee as well as any fictitious name by which the licensee is operating in the Commonwealth. Each license shall be posted prominently in each place of business of the licensee. Licenses shall not be transferable or assignable, by operation of law or otherwise. No licensee shall use any name in the Commonwealth other than the legal name or fictitious name set forth on the license issued by the Commission.

No licensee shall open an additional office or relocate any place of business without prior approval of the Commission. Applications for such approval shall be made in writing on a form provided by the Commissioner and shall be accompanied by payment of a $150 nonrefundable application fee or other reasonable amount that the Commission may prescribe by regulation. The application shall be approved unless the Commission finds that the applicant does not have the required liquid assets or has not conducted business under this chapter efficiently, fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with law. The application shall be deemed approved if notice to the contrary has not been mailed by the Commission to the applicant within 30 days of the date the application is received by the Commission. After approval, the applicant shall give written notice to the Commissioner within 10 days of the commencement of business at the additional location or relocated place of business.

Every licensee shall within 10 days notify the Commissioner, in writing, of the closing of any business location and of the name, address, and position of each new senior officer, member, partner, or director and provide such other information with respect to any such change as the Commissioner may reasonably require.

Every license shall remain in force until it has been surrendered, revoked, or suspended. The surrender, revocation, or suspension of a license shall not affect any preexisting legal right or obligation of such licensee.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-487; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and added “or other reasonable amount that the Commission may prescribe by regulation” in subsection B in the second sentence at the end.

§ 6.2-2208.
Acquisition of control; application.

Except as provided in this section, no person shall acquire, directly or indirectly, 25 percent or more of the voting shares of a corporation or 25 percent or more of the ownership of any other person licensed to conduct business under this chapter unless such person first:

Files an application with the Commission in such form as the Commissioner may prescribe from time to time;

Delivers such other information to the Commissioner as the Commissioner may require concerning the financial responsibility, background, experience, and activities of the applicant, its directors, senior officers, principals, and members and of any proposed new directors, senior officers, principals, or members of the licensee; and

Pays such application fee as the Commission may prescribe.

Upon the filing and investigation of an application, the Commission shall permit the applicant to acquire the interest in the licensee if it finds that the applicant, its members if applicable, its directors, senior officers, trustees, and principals and any proposed new directors, members, senior officers, trustees, and principals have the financial responsibility, character, reputation, experience, and general fitness to warrant belief that the business will be operated efficiently and fairly, in the public interest, and in accordance with law. The Commission shall grant or deny the application within 60 days from the date a completed application accompanied by the required fee is filed unless the period is extended by order of the Commissioner reciting the reasons for the extension. If the application is denied, the Commission shall notify the applicant of the denial and the reasons for the denial.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to (i) the acquisition of an interest in a licensee, directly or indirectly, including an acquisition by merger or consolidation by or with a person licensed under this chapter; (ii) the acquisition of an interest in a licensee, directly or indirectly, by merger or consolidation by or with a person affiliated through common ownership with the licensee; or (iii) the acquisition of an interest in a licensee by bequest, descent, survivorship, or operation of law. The person acquiring an interest in a licensee in a transaction that is exempt from filing an application by this subsection shall send written notice to the Commissioner of such acquisition within 30 days of its closing.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-488.

§ 6.2-2209.
Retention of books, accounts, and records.

Every licensee shall maintain in its licensed offices such books, accounts, and records as the Commission may reasonably require in order to determine whether such licensee is complying with the provisions of this chapter and rules and regulations adopted in furtherance thereof. Such books, accounts, and records shall be maintained apart and separate from any other business in which the licensee is involved. Such records relating to title loans shall be retained for at least three years after final payment is made on any title loan.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-489.

§ 6.2-2210.
Annual report.

Each licensee under this chapter shall annually, on or before March 25, file a written report with the Commissioner containing such information as the Commissioner may require concerning his business and operations during the preceding calendar year as to each licensed place of business. Reports shall be made under oath and shall be in the form prescribed by the Commissioner.

The Commissioner shall publish annually and make available to the public an analysis of the information required under this section and other information the Commissioner may choose to include. The published analysis shall include all of the following:

The total number of borrowers, loans, defaulted loans, and charged-off loans and the total dollar value of the charged-off loans;

The average loan size, average contracted annual percentage rate, average contracted charges per loan, total contracted loan charges, and total loan charges actually paid;

The total number of deposit item return fees and the total dollar value of those charges;

The total number of licensee business locations and the average number of borrowers per location;

The total number of title loan contracts that resulted in repossession or surrender of a vehicle, the total number of title loan contracts that resulted in a borrower redeeming a repossessed or surrendered vehicle, the total number of repossessed or surrendered vehicles that were sold, the total fair market value of repossessed or surrendered vehicles that were sold as stated in the loan contracts, the total amount of proceeds licensees received from the sale of repossessed or surrendered vehicles, the total amount of sale proceeds in excess of the redemption amount paid to borrowers as described in subsection C of §

6.2-2217

, the total amount of charges licensees received from borrowers related to the repossession and sale of vehicles, and the percentage of all title loan contracts that resulted in a repossession of a vehicle; and

A summary of pending and completed enforcement actions, which shall include lists of suspended or revoked licenses, cease and desist orders, and civil penalties pursuant to this chapter.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-490; 2020, cc. 1215, 1258.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 1215 and 1258, cl. 5 provides: “That the provisions of the first and second enactments of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2021, except that the database required by §

6.2-1810

of the Code of Virginia, as amended by this act, shall be modified to accommodate the provisions of this first enactment of this act by January 1, 2022.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1215 and 1258 are identical, effective January 1, 2021, and added subsection B.

§ 6.2-2211.
Other reporting requirements.

Within 15 days following the occurrence of any of the following events, a licensee shall file a written report with the Commission describing such event and its expected impact upon the business of the licensee:

The filing of bankruptcy, reorganization, or receivership proceedings by or against the licensee;

The institution of administrative or regulatory proceedings against the licensee by any governmental authority;

Any felony indictments of the licensee or any of its members, partners, directors, officers, or principals;

Any felony conviction of the licensee or any of its members, partners, directors, officers, or principals; and

Such other event as the Commission may prescribe by regulation.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-491.

§ 6.2-2212.
Investigations; examinations.

The Commission may, by its designated officers and employees, as often as it deems necessary, investigate and examine the affairs, business, premises, and records of any person licensed or required to be licensed under this chapter insofar as they pertain to any business for which a license is required by this chapter. Examinations of licensees shall be conducted at least once in each three-year period. In the course of such investigations and examinations, the owners, members, officers, directors, partners, trustees, beneficiaries, and employees of such person being investigated or examined shall, upon demand of the person making such investigation or examination, afford full access to all premises, books, records, and information that the person making such investigation or examination deems necessary. For the foregoing purposes, the person making such investigation or examination shall have authority to administer oaths, examine under oath all the aforementioned persons, and compel the production of papers and objects of all kinds.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-492.

§ 6.2-2213.
Annual fees.

In order to defray the costs of their examination, supervision, and regulation, every licensee under this chapter shall pay an annual fee calculated in accordance with a schedule set by the Commission. The schedule shall bear a reasonable relationship to the business volume of such licensees, the actual costs of their examinations, and other factors relating to their supervision and regulation. All such fees shall be assessed on or before September 15 for every calendar year. All such fees shall be paid by the licensee to the State Treasurer on or before October 15 following each assessment.

In addition to the annual fee prescribed in subsection A, when it becomes necessary to examine or investigate the books and records of a licensee under this chapter at a location outside the Commonwealth, the licensee shall be liable for and shall pay to the Commission within 30 days of the presentation of an itemized statement, the actual travel and reasonable living expenses incurred on account of its examination, supervision, and regulation, or shall pay at a reasonable per diem rate approved by the Commission.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-493.

§ 6.2-2214.
Regulations.

The Commission shall adopt such regulations as it deems appropriate to effect the purposes of this chapter. Before adopting any such regulation, the Commission shall give reasonable notice of its content and shall afford interested parties an opportunity to be heard, in accordance with the Commission’s Rules of Practice and Procedure.

History.

2010, c. 477, § 6.1-494.